North Carolina statutes. Chapter 122C. Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Act of 1985.
Article 4. Organization and System for Delivery of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services.
§§ 122C-103 through 122C-110.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 2. State, County and Area Authority.

§ 122C-111.
Administration.

The Secretary shall administer and enforce the provisions of this Chapter and the rules of the Commission and shall operate State facilities. An area director or program director shall (i) manage the public mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse system for the area authority or county program according to the local business plan, and (ii) enforce applicable State laws, rules of the Commission, and rules of the Secretary. The Secretary in cooperation with area and county program directors and State facility directors shall provide for the coordination of public services between area authorities, county programs, and State facilities. The area authority or county program shall monitor the provision of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services for compliance with the law, which monitoring and management shall not supersede or duplicate the regulatory authority or functions of agencies of the Department.

History.

1963, c. 1166, s. 3; 1973, c. 476, s. 133; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 2001-437, s. 1.6; 2002-164, s. 4.2; 2006-142, s. 4(b).

§ 122C-112.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2001-437, s. 1.7(a), effective July 1, 2002.

§ 122C-112.1.
Powers and duties of the Secretary.

The Secretary shall do all of the following:

Oversee development and implementation of the State Plan for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services.

Enforce the provisions of this Chapter and the rules of the Commission and the Secretary.

Establish a process and criteria for the submission, review, and approval or disapproval of LME business plans submitted by area authorities and county programs for the management of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services.

Adopt rules specifying the content and format of LME business plans.

Review LME business plans and, upon approval of the plan, certify the submitting area authority or county program to manage the delivery of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services in the applicable catchment area.

Establish comprehensive, cohesive oversight and monitoring procedures and processes to ensure continuous compliance by area authorities, county programs, and all providers of public services with State and federal policy, law, and standards. The procedures shall include the development and use of critical performance measures and report cards for each area authority and county program.

Conduct regularly scheduled monitoring and oversight of area authority, county programs, and all providers of public services. Monitoring and oversight shall be used to assess compliance with the LME business plan and implementation of core LME functions. Monitoring shall also include the examination of LME and provider performance on outcome measures including adherence to best practices, the assessment of consumer satisfaction, and the review of client rights complaints.

Make findings and recommendations based on information and data collected pursuant to subdivision (7) of this subsection and submit these findings and recommendations to the applicable area authority board, county program director, board of county commissioners, providers of public services, and to the Local Consumer Advocacy Office.

Provide ongoing and focused technical assistance to area authorities and county programs in the implementation of the LME functions and the establishment and operation of community-based programs. The technical assistance required under this subdivision includes, but is not limited to, the technical assistance required under G.S. 122C-115.4(d)(2). The Secretary shall include in the State Plan a mechanism for monitoring the Department’s success in implementing this duty and the progress of area authorities and county programs in achieving these functions.

Operate State facilities and adopt rules pertaining to their operation.

Develop a unified system of services provided at the community level, by State facilities, and by providers enrolled or under a contract with the State and an area authority or county program.

Adopt rules governing the expenditure of all funds for mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse programs and services.

Adopt rules to implement the appeal procedure authorized by

G.S. 122C-151.2

.

Implement the uniform portal process developed under rules adopted by the Commission for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services in accordance with

G.S. 122C-114

.

Except as provided in G.S. 122C-26(4), adopt rules establishing procedures for waiver of rules adopted by the Secretary under this Chapter.

Notify the clerks of superior court of changes in the designation of State facility regions and of facilities designated under

G.S. 122C-252

.

Promote public awareness and understanding of mental health, mental illness, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse.

Administer and enforce rules that are conditions of participation for federal or State financial aid.

Carry out

G.S. 122C-361

.

Monitor the fiscal and administrative practices of area authorities and county programs to ensure that the programs are accountable to the State for the management and use of federal and State funds allocated for mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services. The Secretary shall ensure maximum accountability by area authorities and county programs for rate-setting methodologies, reimbursement procedures, billing procedures, provider contracting procedures, record keeping, documentation, and other matters pertaining to financial management and fiscal accountability. The Secretary shall further ensure that the practices are consistent with professionally accepted accounting and management principles.

Provide technical assistance, including conflict resolution, to counties in the development and implementation of area authority and county program business plans and other matters, as requested by the county.

Develop a methodology to be used for calculating county resources to reflect cash and in-kind contributions of the county.

Adopt rules establishing program evaluation and management of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services.

Adopt rules regarding the requirements of the federal government for grants-in-aid for mental health, developmental disabilities, or substance abuse programs which may be made available to area authorities or county programs or the State. This section shall be liberally construed in order that the State and its citizens may benefit from the grants-in-aid.

Adopt rules for determining minimally adequate services for purposes of

G.S. 122C-124.1

and

G.S. 122C-125

.

Establish a process for approving area authorities and county programs to provide services directly in accordance with

G.S. 122C-141

.

Sponsor training opportunities in the fields of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse.

Enforce the protection of the rights of clients served by State facilities, area authorities, county programs, and providers of public services.

Adopt rules for the enforcement of the protection of the rights of clients being served by State facilities, area authorities, county programs, and providers of public services.

Prior to requesting approval to close a State facility under G.S. 122C-181(b):

Notify the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, and members of the General Assembly who represent catchment areas affected by the closure; and

Present a plan for the closure to the members of the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the House of Representatives Appropriations Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, and the Senate Appropriations Committee on Health and Human Services for their review, advice, and recommendations. The plan shall address specifically how patients will be cared for after closure, how support services to community-based agencies and outreach services will be continued, and the impact on remaining State facilities. In implementing the plan, the Secretary shall take into consideration the comments and recommendations of the committees to which the plan is presented under this subdivision.

Ensure that the State Plan for Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services is coordinated with the Medicaid State Plan and NC Health Choice.

Implement standard forms, quality measures, contracts, processes, and procedures to be used by all area authorities and county programs with other public and private service providers. The Secretary shall consult with LMEs, CFACs, counties, and qualified providers regarding the development of any forms, processes, and procedures required under this subdivision. Any document, process, or procedure developed under this subdivision shall place an obligation upon providers to transmit to LMEs timely client information and outcome data. The Secretary shall also adopt rules regarding what constitutes a clean claim for purposes of billing.When implementing this subdivision, the Secretary shall balance the need for LMEs to exercise discretion in the discharge of their LME functions with the need of qualified providers for a uniform system of doing business with public entities.

Develop and implement critical performance indicators to be used to hold LMEs accountable for managing the mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services system. The performance system indicators shall be implemented no later than July 1, 2007.

Adopt a copayment schedule for behavioral health services, intellectual and developmental disabilities services, and substance use disorder services based on the Medicaid copayments for those services to be used by LMEs and by contractual provider agencies under

G.S. 122C-146

. The copayment schedule adopted under this subdivision shall require a copayment for services identified by the Secretary. Families whose family income is three hundred percent (300%) or greater of the federal poverty level are eligible for services with the applicable copayment.

Develop and adopt rules governing a statewide data system containing waiting list information obtained annually from each LME as required under G.S. 122C-115.4(b)(8). The rules adopted shall establish standardized criteria to be used by LMEs to ensure that the waiting list data are consistent across LMEs. The Department shall use data collected from LMEs under G.S. 122C-115.4(b)(8) for statewide planning and needs projections. The creation of the statewide waiting list data system does not create an entitlement to services for individuals on the waiting list. The Department shall report annually to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services its recommendations based on data obtained annually from each LME. The report shall indicate the services that are most needed throughout the State, plans to address unmet needs, and any cost projections for providing needed services.

The Department shall ensure that developmental disability services funded from State appropriations to or allocations from the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, including CAP-MRDD are authorized on a quarterly, semiannual, or annual basis, in accordance with guidelines issued by the Department, unless a change in the individual’s person-centered plan indicates a different authorization frequency.

The Department shall develop new developmental disability service definitions for developmental disability services funded from State appropriations to or allocations from the Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, including CAP-MRDD that allow for person-centered and self-directed supports.

Adopt rules establishing a procedure for single-county disengagement from an area authority operating under a 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver.

Develop and use a standard contract for all local management entity/managed care organizations for operation of the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver that requires compliance by each LME/MCO with all provisions of the contract to operate the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver and with all applicable provisions of State and federal law.

The Secretary may do the following:

Acquire, by purchase or otherwise in the name of the Department, equipment, supplies, and other personal property necessary to carry out the mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse programs.

Promote and conduct research in the fields of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse; promote best practices.

Receive donations of money, securities, equipment, supplies, or any other personal property of any kind or description that shall be used by the Secretary for the purpose of carrying out mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse programs. Any donations shall be reported to the Office of State Budget and Management as determined by that office.

Accept, allocate, and spend any federal funds for mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse activities that may be made available to the State by the federal government. This Chapter shall be liberally construed in order that the State and its citizens may benefit fully from these funds. Any federal funds received shall be deposited with the Department of State Treasurer and shall be appropriated by the General Assembly for the mental health, developmental disabilities, or substance abuse purposes specified.

Enter into agreements authorized by

G.S. 122C-346

.

Notwithstanding

G.S. 126-18

, authorize funds for contracting with a person, firm, or corporation for aid or assistance in locating, recruiting, or arranging employment of health care professionals in any facility listed in

G.S. 122C-181

.

Contract with one or more private providers or other public service agencies to serve clients of an area authority or county program and reallocate program funds to pay for services under the contract if the Secretary finds all of the following:

The area authority or county program refuses or has failed to provide the services to clients within its catchment area, or provide specialty services in another catchment area, in a manner that is at least adequate.

Clients within the area authority or county program catchment area will either not be served or will suffer an unreasonable hardship if required to obtain the services from another area authority or county program.

There is at least one private provider or public service agency within the area authority or county program catchment area, or within reasonable proximity to the catchment area, willing and able to provide services under contract.

Before contracting with a private provider as authorized under this subdivision, the Secretary shall provide written notification to the area authority or county program and to the applicable participating boards of county commissioners of the Secretary’s intent to contract and shall provide the area authority or county program and the applicable participating boards of county commissioners an opportunity to be heard.

Contract with one or more private providers or other public service agencies to serve clients from more than one area authority or county program and reallocate the funds of the applicable programs to pay for services under the contract if the Secretary finds either that there is no other area authority or county program available to act as the administrative entity under contract with the provider or that the area authority or county program refuses or has failed to properly manage and administer the contract with the contract provider, and clients will either not be served or will suffer unreasonable hardship if services are not provided under the contract. Before contracting with a private provider as authorized under this subdivision, the Secretary shall provide written notification to the area authority or county program and the applicable participating boards of county commissioners of the Secretary’s intent to contract and shall provide the area authority or county program and the applicable participating boards of county commissioners an opportunity to be heard.

Require reports of client characteristics, staffing patterns, agency policies or activities, services, or specific financial data of the area authority, county program, and providers of public services. The reports shall not identify individual clients of the area authority or county program unless specifically required by State law or by federal law or regulation or unless valid consent for the release has been given by the client or legally responsible person.

History.

2001-437, s. 1.7(b); 2006-142, s. 4(m); 2007-410, s. 2; 2007-504, s. 2.2; 2009-186, s. 2; 2011-291, ss. 2.43, 2.44; 2012-151, s. 7(b); 2013-85, s. 3; 2021-77, s. 3.

§ 122C-113.
Cooperation between Secretary and other agencies. [Effective until January 1, 2023]

The Secretary shall cooperate with other State agencies to coordinate services for the treatment and habilitation of individuals who are mentally ill, developmentally disabled, or substance abusers. The Secretary shall also coordinate with these agencies to provide public education to promote a better understanding of mental illness, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse.

The Secretary shall promote cooperation among area facilities, State facilities, and local agencies to facilitate the provision of services to individuals who are mentally ill, developmentally disabled, or substance abusers.

(b1)

The Secretary shall cooperate with the State Board of Education and the Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety in coordinating the responsibilities of the Department of Health and Human Services, the State Board of Education, the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, and the Department of Public Instruction for adolescent substance abuse programs. The Department of Health and Human Services, through its Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, in cooperation with the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, shall be responsible for intervention and treatment in non-school based programs. The State Board of Education and the Department of Public Instruction, in consultation with the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, shall have primary responsibility for in-school education, identification, and intervention services, including student assistance programs.

The Secretary shall adopt rules to assure this coordination.

History.

1963, c. 1166, s. 3; 1973, c. 476, s. 133; 1977, c. 679, s. 7; 1981, c. 51, s. 3; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1987, c. 863, s. 1; 1989, c. 625, s. 14; 1993, c. 522, s. 9; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-202, s. 4(s); 2000-137, s. 4(v); 2011-145, s. 19.1(l); 2017-186, s. 2(mmmmm).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(mmmmm), effective December 1, 2017, substituted “Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and” for “Division of” throughout subsection (b1).

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(z), in subsection (b1), substituted “Division of Juvenile Justice” for “Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice” four times. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 122C-113.
Cooperation between Secretary and other agencies. [Effective January 1, 2023]

The Secretary shall cooperate with other State agencies to coordinate services for the treatment and habilitation of individuals who are mentally ill, developmentally disabled, or substance abusers. The Secretary shall also coordinate with these agencies to provide public education to promote a better understanding of mental illness, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse.

The Secretary shall promote cooperation among area facilities, State facilities, and local agencies to facilitate the provision of services to individuals who are mentally ill, developmentally disabled, or substance abusers.

(b1)

The Secretary shall cooperate with the State Board of Education and the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety in coordinating the responsibilities of the Department of Health and Human Services, the State Board of Education, the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, and the Department of Public Instruction for adolescent substance abuse programs. The Department of Health and Human Services, through its Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Abuse Services, in cooperation with the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, shall be responsible for intervention and treatment in non-school based programs. The State Board of Education and the Department of Public Instruction, in consultation with the Division of Juvenile Justice of the Department of Public Safety, shall have primary responsibility for in-school education, identification, and intervention services, including student assistance programs.

The Secretary shall adopt rules to assure this coordination.

History.

1963, c. 1166, s. 3; 1973, c. 476, s. 133; 1977, c. 679, s. 7; 1981, c. 51, s. 3; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1987, c. 863, s. 1; 1989, c. 625, s. 14; 1993, c. 522, s. 9; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a); 1998-202, s. 4(s); 2000-137, s. 4(v); 2011-145, s. 19.1(l); 2017-186, s. 2(mmmmm); 2021-180, s. 19C.9(z).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(aaaaa), made the amendments to this section by Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(z), effective January 1, 2023, and further provides: “On and after that date, any references or directives in this act to the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Adult Correction in the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, the Section of Juvenile Justice of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice, or the Section of Community Corrections of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice shall be construed to apply to the appropriate division of either the Department of Public Safety or the Department of Adult Correction pursuant to the departmental changes enacted by this section.”

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2017-186, s. 2(mmmmm), effective December 1, 2017, substituted “Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and” for “Division of” throughout subsection (b1).

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 19C.9(z), in subsection (b1), substituted “Division of Juvenile Justice” for “Juvenile Justice Section of the Division of Adult Correction and Juvenile Justice” four times. For effective date and applicability, see editor's note.

§ 122C-114.
Powers and duties of the Commission.

The Commission shall have authority as provided by this Chapter, Chapters 90 and 148 of the General Statutes, and by

G.S. 143B-147

.

The Commission shall adopt rules regarding all of the following:

The development of a process for screening, triage, and referral, including a uniform portal process, for implementation by the Secretary as required under G.S. 122C-112.1(14).

LME monitoring of providers of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services.

LME provision of technical assistance to providers of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services.

The requirements of a qualified public or private provider as that term is used in

G.S. 122C-141

. In adopting rules under this subsection, the Commission shall take into account the need to ensure fair competition among providers.

History.

C.S., s. 6153; 1929, c. 265, s. 1; 1933, c. 342, s. 1; 1943, cc. 32, 164; 1945, c. 952, s. 9; 1947, c. 537, s. 5; 1957, c. 1232, s. 1; 1959, c. 348, s. 3; c. 1002, s. 3; c. 1028, ss. 1, 2, 3, 5; 1963, c. 451, s. 1; c. 1166, s. 10; 1973, c. 476, s. 133; 1977, c. 679, s. 7; 1981, c. 51, s. 3; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 2007-504, s. 2.3; 2012-66, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-504, s. 2.3, effective October 1, 2007, designated the existing provisions as subsection (a) and added subsection (b).

§ 122C-115.
Duties of counties; appropriation and allocation of funds by counties and cities.

A county shall provide mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services in accordance with rules, policies, and guidelines adopted pursuant to statewide restructuring of the management responsibilities for the delivery of services for individuals with mental illness, intellectual or other developmental disabilities, and substance abuse disorders under a 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver through an area authority. Beginning July 1, 2012, the catchment area of an area authority shall contain a minimum population of at least 300,000. Beginning July 1, 2013, the catchment area of an area authority shall contain a minimum population of at least 500,000. To the extent this section conflicts with

G.S. 153A-77

or

G.S. 122C-115.1

, the provisions of this section control.

(a1)

Effective July 1, 2012, the Department shall reduce the administrative funding for LMEs that do not comply with the minimum population requirement of 300,000 to a rate consistent with the funding rate provided to LMEs with a population of 300,000.

(a2)

Effective July 1, 2013, the Department shall reassign management responsibilities for Medicaid funds and State funds away from LMEs that are not in compliance with the minimum population requirement of 500,000 to LMEs that are fully compliant with all catchment area requirements, including the minimum population requirements specified in this section.

(a3)

A county that wishes to disengage from a local management entity/managed care organization and realign with another multicounty area authority operating under the 1915(b)/(c) Medicaid Waiver may do so with the approval of the Secretary. The Secretary shall adopt rules to establish a process for county disengagement that shall ensure, at a minimum, the following:

Provision of services is not disrupted by the disengagement.

The disengaging county either is in compliance or plans to merge with an area authority that is in compliance with population requirements provided in G.S. 122C-115(a) of this section.

The timing of the disengagement is accounted for and does not conflict with setting capitation rates.

Adequate notice is provided to the affected counties, the Department of Health and Human Services, and the General Assembly.

Provision for distribution of any real property no longer within the catchment area of the area authority.

Counties shall and cities may appropriate funds for the support of programs that serve the catchment area, whether the programs are physically located within a single county or whether any facility housing a program is owned and operated by the city or county. Counties and cities may make appropriations for the purposes of this Chapter and may allocate for these purposes other revenues not restricted by law, and counties may fund them by levy of property taxes pursuant to G.S. 153A-149(c)(22).

Except as authorized in

G.S. 122C-115.1

, within a catchment area designated in the business plan pursuant to

G.S. 122C-115.2

, a board of county commissioners or two or more boards of county commissioners jointly shall establish an area authority with the approval of the Secretary.

(c1)

Area authorities may add one or more additional counties to their existing catchment area upon the adoption of a resolution to that effect by a majority of the members of the area board and the approval of the Secretary.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, counties shall not reduce county appropriations and expenditures for current operations and ongoing programs and services of area authorities or county programs because of the availability of State-allocated funds, fees, capitation amounts, or fund balance to the area authority or county program. Counties may reduce county appropriations by the amount previously appropriated by the county for one-time, nonrecurring special needs of the area authority or county program.

Beginning on the date that capitated contracts under Article 4 of Chapter 108D of the General Statutes begin, LME/MCOs shall cease managing Medicaid services for all Medicaid recipients other than recipients described in G.S. 108D-40(a)(1), (4), (5), (6), (7), (10), (11), (12), and (13). Until BH IDD tailored plans become operational, all of the following shall occur:

LME/MCOs shall continue to manage the Medicaid services that are covered by the LME/MCOs under the combined 1915(b) and (c) waivers for Medicaid recipients described in G.S. 108D-40(a)(1), (4), (5), (6), (7), (10), (11), (12), and (13).

The Division of Health Benefits shall negotiate actuarially sound capitation rates directly with the LME/MCOs based on the change in composition of the population being served by the LME/MCOs.

Capitation payments under contracts between the Division of Health Benefits and the LME/MCOs shall be made directly to the LME/MCO by the Division of Health Benefits.

Entities operating the BH IDD tailored plans under

G.S. 108D-60

may continue to manage the behavioral health, intellectual and developmental disability, and traumatic brain injury services for any Medicaid recipients described in G.S. 108D-40(a)(4), (5), (7), (10), (11), (12), and (13) under any contract with the Department in accordance with

G.S. 108D-60

(b).

History.

1977, c. 568, s. 1; c. 679, s. 7; 1979, c. 358, ss. 5, 23; 1981, c. 51, s. 3; 1985, c. 589, s. 2; 1989, c. 625, s. 14; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 749, s. 1; 1999-202, s. 1; 2001-437, s. 1.8; 2004-124, s. 10.26(a); 2006-66, s. 10.32(c), (d); 2007-504, s. 1.3; 2011-264, s. 2; 2012-151, ss. 1, 6; 2013-85, s. 4(a)-(c); 2013-363, s. 4.12(a); 2013-378, s. 11; 2013-410, s. 23(a); 2015-245, s. 4; 2018-48, s. 1; 2019-81, ss. 12, 14(a)(8); 2020-88, s. 12(c); 2021-62, ss. 3.4A(b), 4.8(d).

School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative.

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 6.24, provides for the development and implementation of a School-Based Child and Family Team Initiative. See note at

G.S. 115C-105.20

.

Session Laws 2021-62, s. 3.5A.(a)-(h), provides “(a)
When a county disengages from one area authority and realigns with another area authority under

G.S. 122C-115

, a portion of the risk reserve and other funds of the area authority from which the county is disengaging shall be transferred to the area authority with which the county is realigning. The amount of risk reserve and other funds to be transferred shall be determined by the Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) in accordance with a formula or formulas developed in accordance with this section.

“(b)
Any formula developed by DHHS under this section shall consider the stability of both the area authority from which the county is disengaging and the area authority with which the county is realigning. The formula shall support the ability for each area authority to carry out its responsibilities under State law and shall support the successful operation of BH IDD tailored plans under

G.S. 108D-60

. The formula shall assure that the area authority from which the county is disengaging retains sufficient funds to pay any outstanding liabilities to health care providers, staff-related expenses, and other liabilities.

“(c)
Upon the Secretary’s approval of a disengagement under G.S. 122C-115(a3), the area authority from which the county is disengaging and the area authority with which the county is realigning shall provide DHHS with all financial information requested by DHHS that is necessary to determine the amount of funds to be transferred using the formula or formulas developed under this section.

“(d)
Prior to finalizing any formula developed under this section, DHHS shall post the proposed formula on its website and provide notice of the proposed formula to all area authorities, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice, and the Fiscal Research Division. DHHS shall accept public comment on the proposed formula. DHHS shall post the final version of the formula on its website no later than August 1, 2021.

“(e)
No later than October 15, 2021, DHHS shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice, and the Fiscal Research Division on any formulas developed under this section and any funds transferred during the previous quarter. Beginning January 15, 2022, and quarterly thereafter through April 15, 2026, DHHS shall report to the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Medicaid and NC Health Choice, and the Fiscal Research Division on any funds transferred as a result of disengagements during the previous quarter. A final quarterly report shall be due June 30, 2026, for the quarter ending on that date.

“(f)
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the development and application of the formula or formulas under this section shall be exempt from the rulemaking requirements under Article 2A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes and the contested case provisions of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

“(g)
This section is effective when it becomes law and applies to disengagements approved by DHHS with an effective date on or after September 1, 2021.

“(h)
This section shall expire on June 30, 2026.”

§ 122C-115.1.
County governance and operation of mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services program.

A county may operate a county program for mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services as a single county or, pursuant to Article 20 of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, may enter into an interlocal agreement with one or more other counties for the operation of a multicounty program. An interlocal agreement shall provide for the following:

Adoption and administration of the program budget in accordance with Chapter 159 of the General Statutes.

Appointment of a program director to carry out the provisions of

G.S. 122C-111

and duties and responsibilities delegated by the county. Except when specifically waived by the Secretary, the program director shall meet all the following minimum qualifications:

Masters degree.

Related experience.

Management experience.

Any other qualifications required under

G.S. 122C-120.1

.

Repealed by Session Laws 2006-66, s. 10.32(e), effective July 1, 2007.

Compliance with the provisions of this Chapter and the rules of the Commission and the Secretary.

Written notification to the Secretary prior to the termination of the interlocal agreement.

Appointment of an advisory committee. The interlocal agreement shall designate a county manager to whom the advisory committee shall report. The interlocal agreement shall also designate the appointing authorities. The appointing authorities shall make appointments that take into account sufficient citizen participation, equitable representation of the disability groups, and equitable representation of participating counties. The membership shall conform to the requirements provided in

G.S. 122C-118.1

.

Before establishing a county program pursuant to this section, a county board of commissioners shall hold a public hearing with notice published at least 10 days before the hearing.

A county shall ensure that the county program and the services provided through the county program comply with the provisions of this Chapter and the rules adopted by the Commission and the Secretary.

A county program shall submit on a quarterly basis to the Secretary and the board of county commissioners service delivery reports that assess the quality and availability of public services within the county program’s catchment area. The service delivery reports shall include the types of services delivered, number of recipients served, and services requested but not delivered due to staffing, financial, or other constraints. In addition, at least annually, a progress report shall be submitted to the Secretary and the board of county commissioners. The progress report shall include an assessment of the progress in implementing local service plans, goals, and outcomes. All reports shall be in a format and shall contain any additional information required by the Secretary or board of county commissioners.

Within 30 days of the end of each quarter of the fiscal year, the program director and finance officer of the county program shall present to each member of the board of county commissioners a budgetary statement and balance sheet that details the assets, liabilities, and fund balance of the county program. This information shall be read into the minutes of the meeting at which it is presented. The program director or finance officer of the county program shall provide to the board of county commissioners ad hoc reports as requested by the board of county commissioners.

In a single-county program, the program director shall be appointed by the county manager. In a multicounty program, the program director shall be appointed in accordance with the terms of the interlocal agreement.Except when specifically waived by the Secretary, the program director in a single county program shall meet all the following minimum qualifications:

Masters degree.

Related experience.

Management experience.

Any other qualifications required under

G.S. 122C-120.1

.

In a single-county program, an advisory committee shall be appointed by the board of county commissioners and shall report to the county manager. The appointments shall take into account sufficient citizen participation, equitable representation of the disability groups, and equitable representation of participating counties. The membership shall conform to the requirements in

G.S. 122C-118.1

. In a multicounty program, the advisory committee shall be appointed in accordance with the terms of the interlocal agreement.

The county program may contract to provide services to governmental or private entities, including Employee Assistance Programs.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, this Chapter applies to counties that provide mental health, developmental disabilities, and substance abuse services through a county program. As used in the applicable sections of this Article, the terms “area authority”, “area program”, and “area facility” shall be construed to include “county program”.

History.

2001-437, s. 1.9; 2006-66, s. 10.32(e); 2006-142, s. 4(f), (g), (i), (j); 2012-151, s. 2(b).